Hawaii statutes.
[§661B-2]
Presentation of claim. (a) A petition for relief filed pursuant to this
chapter shall be filed in the circuit court of the circuit in which the
petitioner lives, or if the petitioner lives outside the State, in the circuit
court of the first circuit. The petitioner shall serve the petition upon the
attorney general, and if the prosecuting authority was other than the attorney
general, upon the prosecuting authority. The petition shall set forth the
facts and authority that support the petitioner's claim.

(b) No later than
sixty days after service, the attorney general shall file with the court an
answer that shall either admit that the petitioner is entitled to compensation
or deny the petitioner's claim.

If the attorney
general admits that the petitioner is entitled to compensation, the court shall
conduct a trial to determine the amount of compensation; provided that if the
attorney general and the petitioner agree on the amount of the compensation,
the court may issue a final judgment awarding the petitioner the amount agreed
upon or, in its discretion, conduct a trial to determine the amount to award
the petitioner.

If the attorney
general denies that the petitioner is entitled to compensation, then the court
shall conduct a trial to determine if the petitioner is entitled to
compensation and the amount, if any.

(c) Notwithstanding
any other provision of law to the contrary, no person shall be allowed to
intervene in the proceeding; provided that if the attorney general did not
obtain the conviction of the petitioner, then the prevailing prosecuting
authority may state its position on the petitioner's claim in a statement to
the court. If the attorney general did not obtain the conviction of the
petitioner, then the prevailing prosecuting authority shall provide the
attorney general with any information or assistance that the attorney general
may request.

(d) Any action
against the State under this chapter shall be tried by the court without a
jury; provided that the court, with the consent of all the parties, may order a
trial with a jury whose verdict shall have the same effect as if trial by jury
had been a matter of right. [L 2016, c 156, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next